Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1062
Federal Mineral Leasing Act funds; disposition.

All money paid semiannually to the State Treasurer by the United States Government under the federal Mineral Leasing Act shall be placed in the permanent school fund, subject to the laws governing such permanent school fund.

Laws 1953, c. 260, § 1, p. 870;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1328;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 708.